Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1429.01
Vending machines; legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that the incumbent health risks associated with using tobacco products have been scientifically proven. The Legislature further finds that the growing number of young people who start using tobacco products is staggering, and even more abhorrent are the ages at which such use begins. The Legislature has established an age restriction on the use of tobacco products. To ensure that the use of tobacco products among young people is discouraged to the maximum extent possible, it is the intent of the Legislature to ban the use of vending machines and similar devices to dispense tobacco products in facilities, buildings, or areas which are open to the general public within Nebraska.

Laws 1992, LB 130, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB149, § 10.